Hawaii statutes.
[§200-63] Questioning and detaining
suspected persons aboard a vessel. An enforcement officer may detain any
person found upon a vessel under circumstances as reasonably justify a
suspicion that the person boarded without permission for the purpose of demanding,
and may demand of the person, the person's name, address, and the nature of the
person's business upon the vessel. If the enforcement officer has reason to
believe that the person has no right to be upon the vessel, the enforcement
officer may arrest the person without a warrant on the charge of violating
section 200-62. [L 1991, c 272, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next